Nevada, session 83, AB24.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 389 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 6, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. 1. A pupil may be granted credit for a specific
course of study without having attended the regularly scheduled
classes in the course if the pupil is enrolled in a program of
competency-based education and demonstrates his or her
proficiency to meet the objectives of:
(a) The course through a portfolio of the pupil’s work;
(b) A particular area or areas of the course through the pupil’s
performance of a task that is designed to measure the proficiency
of the pupil in that particular area or areas;
(c) The course as measured against the criteria for competency
approved under a program of competency-based education; or
(d) The course as measured against the criteria prescribed by
the State Board pursuant to subsection 2.
-
*AB24*

– 3 –
2. The State Board shall adopt regulations that prescribe the
criteria, other than the criteria described in paragraphs (a), (b)
and (c) of subsection 1, that may be used to determine whether a
pupil has achieved proficiency in a course.
Sec. 3. 1. The board of trustees of a school district or the
governing body of a charter school or a university school for
profoundly gifted pupils may submit an application to the
Department to provide a program of competency-based education.
In addition, a committee to form a charter school, or a charter
management organization applying to form a charter school
pursuant to NRS 388A.249, may submit an application to the
Department to provide a program of competency-based education
if the application to form the charter school submitted by the
committee or charter management organization pursuant to NRS
388A.246 indicates that the charter school intends to provide a
program of competency-based education.
2. An application to provide a program of competency-based
education must include:
(a) All the information prescribed by the State Board by
regulation;
(b) Proof satisfactory to the Department that the program
satisfies all applicable statutes and regulations; and
(c) A description of how the program will ensure access to
technology for pupils and teachers or other school employees and
communicate with pupils, their families and staff regarding the
program of competency-based education.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
Department shall approve an application submitted pursuant to
this section if the application satisfies the requirements of NRS
389.200 and sections 2 to 6, inclusive, of this act and all other
applicable statutes and regulations. The Department shall provide
written notice to the applicant of the Department’s approval or
denial of the application.
4. If the Department denies an application, the Department
shall include in the written notice the reasons for the denial and
the deficiencies of the application. The applicant must be granted
30 days after receipt of the written notice to correct any
deficiencies identified in the written notice and resubmit the
application. The Department shall approve an application that has
been resubmitted pursuant to this subsection if the application
satisfies the requirements of NRS 389.200 and sections 2 to 6,
inclusive, of this act and all other applicable statutes and
regulations.
5. The board of trustees of each school district and the
governing body of each charter school or university school for
-
*AB24*

– 4 –
profoundly gifted pupils that provides a program of competency-
based education shall:
(a) Develop a plan for conducting the program of competency-
based education.
(b) Present the plan for conducting the program of
competency-based education to the public at a public meeting or,
if the plan was developed by the governing body of a charter
school or university school for profoundly gifted pupils, to the
sponsor of the charter school or university school, as applicable, at
least 45 days before the first day of each school year.
(c) Provide a copy of the plan for conducting the program of
competency-based education to the school community, parents and
employees of the school district, charter school or university
school for profoundly gifted pupils.
Sec. 4. If the board of trustees of a school district or the
governing body of a charter school or university school for
profoundly gifted pupils provides a program of competency-based
education, the board or governing body, as applicable, shall
ensure that the persons who operate the program on a day-to-day
basis comply with and carry out all applicable requirements,
statutes, regulations, rules and policies of the school district,
charter school or university school for profoundly gifted pupils,
including, without limitation:
1. Requirements for graduation;
2. Accountability of public schools, as set forth in chapter
385A of NRS;
3. Provisions governing the attendance and truancy of pupils,
as set forth in NRS 392.040 to 392.220, inclusive;
4. Discipline of pupils; and
5. The requirements for assessing the achievement of pupils
which must include, without limitation, the administration of the
examinations required by NRS 390.105 and, if applicable for the
grade levels of the pupils enrolled, the college and career
readiness assessment conducted pursuant to NRS 390.610.
Sec. 5. 1. A program of competency-based education may
include, without limitation, an opportunity for pupils to participate
in the program:
(a) For a shorter school day or a longer school day than that
regularly provided for in the school district, charter school or
university school for profoundly gifted pupils, as applicable; and
(b) During any part of the calendar year.
2. If a program of competency-based education is provided
for pupils on a full-time basis, the program must include at least
as many hours or minutes of instruction as would be provided
under a program consisting of 180 days or a number of days
-
*AB24*

– 5 –
established by the State Board by regulation pursuant to section 6
of this act.
3. A pupil enrolled in a program of competency-based
education on a full-time basis who demonstrates sufficient
proficiency to meet the objectives of a course may complete the
course in a shorter period of time than is normally allotted for the
course.
Sec. 6. 1. The State Board shall adopt regulations that
prescribe the process for submission of an application by the
board of trustees of a school district, the governing body of a
charter school or university school for profoundly gifted pupils, a
committee to form a charter school created pursuant to NRS
388A.240 or a charter management organization applying to form
a charter school pursuant to NRS 388A.249 to provide a program
of competency-based education and the contents of the
application.
2. The State Board may adopt regulations as it determines are
necessary to carry out the provisions of sections 2 to 6, inclusive,
of this act.
Sec. 7. NRS 389.171 is hereby amended to read as follows:
389.171 1. A pupil may be granted credit for a specific
course of study without having attended the regularly scheduled
classes in the course if the pupil demonstrates his or her proficiency
to meet the:
(a) Objectives of the course through the pupil’s performance on
an examination prescribed by the State Board;
(b) Objectives of a particular area or areas of the course in
which the pupil is deficient through the pupil’s performance on an
examination developed by the principal and the pupil’s teacher who
provides instruction in the course that is designed to measure the
proficiency of the pupil in that particular area or areas; or
(c) Objectives of the course through the pupil’s performance on
an examination that the principal determines is as rigorous or more
rigorous than the examination prescribed by the State Board
pursuant to paragraph (a), including, without limitation, an advanced
placement examination in the subject area of the course . [;
(d) Objectives of the course through a portfolio of the pupil’s
work;
(e) Objectives of a particular area or areas of the course through
the pupil’s performance of a task that is designed to measure the
proficiency of the pupil in that particular area or areas; or
(f) Objectives of the course as measured against the criteria
prescribed by the State Board pursuant to paragraph (d) of
subsection 2.]
2. The State Board shall adopt regulations that prescribe the:
-
*AB24*

– 6 –
(a) Form on which a pupil may apply to the board of trustees of
a school district in which the pupil attends school or the governing
body of the charter school in which the pupil is enrolled to be
granted credit pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Courses of study for which pupils may be granted credit
pursuant to subsection 1;
(c) Minimum score on the examination prescribed pursuant to
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 that is required to demonstrate
proficiency in a course; and
(d) Criteria, other than the criteria described in paragraphs (a)
[to (e), inclusive,] , (b) and (c) of subsection 1, that may be used to
determine whether a pupil has achieved proficiency in a course.
Sec. 8. NRS 389.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
389.200 As used in NRS 389.200 [, 389.210 and 389.230,] and
sections 2 to 6, inclusive, of this act, “competency-based education”
means a system of instruction by which a pupil advances to a higher
level of learning when the pupil demonstrates mastery of a concept
or skill, regardless of the time, place or pace at which the pupil
progresses.
Sec. 9. NRS 389.210 and 389.230 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 10. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTIONS
389.210 Establishment of pilot program to provide
competency-based education; regulations; requirements for
schools selected to participate in program.
1. The Department shall establish a pilot program to provide
competency-based education.
2. The State Board shall adopt regulations that prescribe:
(a) The process for submission of an application by the board of
trustees of a school district or the governing body of a charter school
to participate in the pilot program; and
(b) The qualifications and conditions for participation by a
school in the pilot program, including, without limitation:
(1) A commitment by the school district or charter school to
implement competency-based education for not less than 5 years;
and
(2) Evidence of support for the implementation of
competency-based education by the community served by the
school district or charter school.
-
*AB24*

– 7 –
3. A school selected to participate in the pilot program to
provide competency-based education shall:
(a) Implement a system of instruction by which a pupil advances
to a higher level of learning when the pupil demonstrates mastery of
a concept or skill;
(b) Establish concrete skills on which a pupil will be evaluated
that include explicit, measurable and transferable learning
objectives;
(c) Ensure that assessment is a meaningful and positive learning
experience for pupils;
(d) Ensure that pupils receive timely and differentiated support
based upon their individual learning needs; and
(e) Ensure that pupils are able to apply knowledge learned,
create new knowledge and develop important skills and dispositions
relating to such knowledge.
4. If at least one application to participate in the pilot program
is made on behalf of a school that primarily serves pupils who are at
risk or credit deficient, or in need of credit retrieval, the Department
must select at least one such school to participate in the pilot
program.
5. As used in this section, a pupil is “at risk” if the pupil has an
economic or academic disadvantage such that he or she requires
special services and assistance to enable him or her to succeed in
educational programs. The term includes, without limitation, pupils
who are members of economically disadvantaged families, pupils
who are English learners, pupils who are at risk of dropping out of
high school and pupils who do not meet minimum standards of
academic proficiency. The term does not include a pupil with a
disability.
389.230 Public campaign to raise awareness; meetings to
inform superintendents of school districts; distribution of
available money to carry out program.
1. The Department of Education shall:
(a) Conduct a public campaign to raise awareness about
competency-based education.
(b) Conduct one or more meetings with the superintendents of
the school districts for the purpose of increasing:
(1) Understanding of competency-based education; and
(2) Interest in implementing a system of competency-based
education.
2. To the extent that money is available for that purpose, the
Department of Education may, through a competitive grants
program, distribute any money appropriated to the Department to
carry out the pilot program to provide competency-based education
established pursuant to NRS 389.210. Grants must be awarded by
-
*AB24*

– 8 –
the Department to schools selected to participate in the program
based upon money available for this purpose.
H
-
*AB24*